California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) As used in this section, “Section 8” means Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (Sec. 1437 et seq., Title 42, U.S.C.).

(d) The State Department of Social Services may, upon the request of a local public entity, provide technical assistance for the purpose of developing applications and plans from the local public entity for federal funding under the Section 8 housing certificate program created by Section 553 of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act (P.L. 101-625).

(e) The State Department of Social Services is authorized to adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code in order to implement the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 292, Sec. 3.   Effective July 23, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

16517.5.

(a) A social worker or probation officer acting as an officer of the court shall not make an out-of-home placement of a dependent or ward of the court pursuant to this chapter with any of the following:

(1) A relative of the social worker or probation officer responsible for the placement of the child.

(2) The spouse of a relative described in paragraph (1).

(b) A social worker or probation officer acting as an officer of the court shall not receive compensation for the out-of-home placement of a dependent or ward of the court other than the compensation received as an employee of the county or the state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16517 (as added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 497, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 631.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16518.

The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with county placement agencies, foster care providers, and other interested community parties, shall establish criteria to be used for conducting a comprehensive home study of a licensed or foster parent that evaluates the ability, readiness, and willingness of the licensed foster parent to meet the varying needs of children. The department shall consult with the Task Force on Accreditation of Services for Children established pursuant to Section 1565 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall, as appropriate, consider the accreditation standards that are included in the accreditation plan when developing the home study criteria. The home study criteria developed pursuant to this section shall become operative at such time as the regulations adopted
 pursuant to Section 1521.6 of the Health and Safety Code are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 967, Sec. 3.   (AB 2466)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16518.5.

When placing foster children, the placing agency shall not decline to place a child with a resource family because of a resource family parent’s actual or perceived sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 967, Sec. 4.   (AB 2466)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Safety, permanency, and well-being are crucial for the more than 82,000 California children in foster care, and are paramount to achieving both federal and state child welfare system improvement goals. Foster children need safe homes with permanent connections to family or other caring adults. The current licensing and approval system, which screens families to care for foster children, fails to support these outcomes.

(b) Children in foster care live in a variety of out-of-home care settings: licensed foster family homes, approved relative and nonrelative extended family member homes, foster family agencies, and group homes. All of these placement types, considered facilities under current law, are required to meet the respective health and safety standards in order to be licensed or approved. This has produced administrative inefficiencies and confusion among stakeholders, and has contributed to difficulty in recruiting suitable foster family homes for children in out-of-home care. Increasing the number of available suitable homes will improve the likelihood that the best home will be initially identified to meet a child’s particular needs.

(c) Child safety and well-being are not achieved solely by ensuring that the home the child is placed in is free from physical hazards and that adults living
 in the home do not have disqualifying criminal convictions or past reports of child abuse. Child safety and well-being are also dependent upon consideration of the resource family’s psychosocial history that includes physical health, mental health, alcohol and substance abuse, family violence or abuse, and experience caring for children.

(d) Research shows that children in out-of-home care placed with relatives and nonrelative extended family members are more stable, more likely to be placed with siblings, and more likely to stay connected to their community and extended family. California statutory and regulatory provisions should maximize the likelihood that a child will initially be placed in the care of a safe relative or nonrelative extended family member who is willing to provide permanent care if reunification cannot be achieved.

(e) Families living in the same neighborhood
 as a family from which a child has been removed are often best suited to provide for the immediate placement needs of that child.

(f) Families who provide care to children in out-of-home placement are a valuable resource to the people of this state and to the children for whom they provide care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 464, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Resource Family Approval Program [16519.3. - 16519.7.]

16519.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and no later than January 1, 2027, the department shall adopt a simplified approval process for relative caregivers consistent with the definition of foster family homes for the purposes of Title IV-E eligibility in Section 1355.20 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The simplified approval process for relative and kinship caregivers shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and after necessary federal approval of state plan amendments has been obtained.

(b) The department may convene government-to-government consultation with tribes and communicate
 with other interested individuals and organizations to develop a simplified approval process for relative and kinship caregivers that achieves the goals of safety, permanency, and well-being for children in out-of-home care. The communication may include seeking feedback from relative and kinship caregivers, foster youth, county child welfare and probation agencies, foster family agencies, tribes, tribal organizations, tribal consortia, and other interested community partners.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “relative” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 11400, or an extended family member of an Indian child, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 224.1.

(2) The department shall consider using a broader definition
 of “relative” that includes nonrelative extended family members, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 11400.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.   (AB 2830)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.4.

(a) Upon implementation of a simplified approval process adopted pursuant to Section 16519.3, and no later than 18 months after implementation, the department shall track and report to the Legislature all of the following to the extent that the requested data can be tracked in the statewide child welfare information system: 

(1) The average length of time required for an applicant who had placement prior to approval to receive resource family approval, and whether the average length of time has increased, decreased, or remained the same over time, after January 1, 2023.

(2) Whether the placement
 of children or youth with relatives has increased, decreased, or remained the same over time, after January 1, 2023. 

(3) What, if any, barriers exist that affect implementation of the simplified approval process described in Section 16519.3. 

(b) On or before September 30, 2026, the department shall report to the Legislature for consideration the additional statutory changes required to fully implement separate resource family approval standards for relative caregivers. 

(c) (1) The report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) and the report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall become inoperative on June 30, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   (AB 2830)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative June 30, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.5.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with county child welfare agencies, foster parent associations, and other interested community parties, shall implement a unified, family friendly, and child-centered resource family approval process to replace the existing multiple processes for licensing foster family homes, certifying foster homes by licensed foster family agencies, approving relatives and nonrelative extended family members as foster care providers, and approving guardians and adoptive families.

(b) (1) Counties shall be selected to participate on a voluntary basis as early implementation counties for the purpose of participating
 in the initial development of the approval process. Early implementation counties shall be selected according to criteria developed by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California. In selecting the five early implementation counties, the department shall promote diversity among the participating counties in terms of size and geographic location.

(2) Additional counties may participate in the early implementation of the program upon authorization by the department.

(3) The State Department of Social Services shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Selecting early implementation counties, based on criteria established by the department in consultation with the
 County Welfare Directors Association of California.

(B) Establishing timeframes for participating counties to submit an implementation plan, enter into terms and conditions for early implementation participation in the program, train appropriate staff, and accept applications from resource families.

(C) Entering into terms and conditions for early implementation participation in the program by counties.

(4) Counties participating in the early implementation of the program shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Submitting an implementation plan.

(B) Entering into terms and conditions for
 early implementation participation in the program.

(C) Consulting with the county probation department in the development of the implementation plan.

(D) Training appropriate staff.

(E) Accepting applications from resource families within the timeframes established by the department.

(5) (A) Approved relatives and nonrelative extended family members, licensed foster family homes, or approved adoptive homes that have completed the license or approval process prior to statewide implementation of the program shall not be considered part of the program. The otherwise applicable assessment and oversight processes shall continue to be
 administered for families and facilities not included in the program.

(B) Upon implementation of the program in a county, that county shall not accept new applications for the licensure of foster family homes, the approval of relative and nonrelative extended family members, or the approval of prospective guardians and adoptive homes.

(6) The department may waive regulations that pose a barrier to the early implementation and operation of this program. The waiver of a regulation by the department pursuant to this section applies to only those counties or foster family agencies participating in the early implementation of the program and only for the duration of the program.

(7) This subdivision is inoperative on
 January 1, 2017.

(c) (1) For purposes of this article, “resource family” means an individual or family that has successfully met both the home environment assessment standards and the permanency assessment criteria adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) necessary for providing care for a child placed by a public or private child placement agency by court order, or voluntarily placed by a parent or legal guardian. A resource family shall demonstrate all of the following:

(A) An understanding of the safety, permanence, and well-being needs of children who have been victims of child abuse and neglect, and the capacity and willingness to meet those needs, including the need for protection, and the willingness to make use of support resources offered by the agency, or a
 support structure in place, or both.

(B) An understanding of children’s needs and development, effective parenting skills or knowledge about parenting, and the capacity to act as a reasonable, prudent parent in day-to-day decisionmaking.

(C) An understanding of the role of the individual or family as a resource family and the capacity to work cooperatively with the agency, birth family, as appropriate, other resource families, and other service providers in implementing the child’s case plan and supporting transitions in placement settings or permanency.

(D) The financial ability within the household to ensure the stability and financial security of the family. This requirement may be waived for relative and
 nonrelative extended family member resource families on a case-by-case basis. For purposes of this subparagraph, there is no minimum income requirement and an applicant who will rely on the funding described in subdivision (l) to meet additional household expenses incurred due to the placement of a child shall not, for this reason, be denied approval as a resource family.

(E) An ability and willingness to provide a family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences that serves the needs of the child.

(F) An ability and willingness to meet the needs of the child regardless of the child’s sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression, and that, should difficulties around these issues arise, a willingness to obtain resources offered by the county or foster
 family agency or other available resources to meet those needs.

(2) For purposes of this article, and unless otherwise specified, references to a “child” include a “nonminor dependent” and “nonminor former dependent or ward,” as defined in subdivision (v) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400.

(3) There is no fundamental right to approval as a resource family. Emergency placement of a child pursuant to Section 309, 319, 361.45, or 727.05, or with a resource family applicant pursuant to subdivision (e), does not entitle an applicant to approval as a resource family.

(4) (A) A resource family shall be considered eligible to provide foster care for children in out-of-home placement and
 approved for adoption and guardianship.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a county may approve a resource family to care for a specific child, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section. Child-specific approval shall be considered if the applicant is a relative or nonrelative extended family member who has an established and significant relationship with a child or a child is already placed in the home of the relative or nonrelative extended family member pursuant to subdivision (e) or Section 309, 319, 361.45, or 727.05.

(ii) When child-specific approval is granted to a relative who has received a criminal records exemption pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the child’s placement shall be funded pursuant to Section 11461.3 and the relative shall not be eligible for federal financial participation while the child is placed with them.

(iii) In the case of an Indian child for whom the child’s tribe is not exercising its right to approve a home, the county shall apply the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian community to resource family approval for that child, as required by subdivision (f) of Section 361.31 and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.). The department shall engage in the tribal consultation process and develop regulations to implement this clause. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1
 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this clause through all-county letters or other similar instruction, and provide guidance to counties regarding consistent implementation of this clause.

(5) For purposes of this article, “resource family approval” means that the applicant or resource family successfully meets the home environment assessment and permanency assessment standards. This approval is in lieu of a foster family home license issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, a certificate of approval issued by a licensed foster family agency, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code, relative or nonrelative extended family member approval, guardianship approval, and the adoption home study
 approval.

(6) Approval of a resource family does not guarantee an initial, continued, or adoptive placement of a child with a resource family or with a relative or nonrelative extended family member. Approval of a resource family does not guarantee the establishment of a legal guardianship of a child with a resource family.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, the county shall, consistent with Sections 1520.3 and 1558.1 of the Health and Safety Code, cease any further review of an application if the applicant has had a previous application denial by the department or a county within the preceding year, or if the applicant has had a previous rescission, revocation, or exemption denial or exemption rescission by the department or a county
 within the preceding two years.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the county may continue to review an application if it has determined that the reasons for the previous denial, rescission, or revocation were due to circumstances and conditions that either have been corrected or are no longer in existence. If an individual was excluded from a resource family home or facility licensed by the department, the county shall cease review of the individual’s application unless the excluded individual has been reinstated pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 16519.6 of this code or pursuant to Section 1569.53, subdivision (h) of Section 1558, subdivision (h) of Section 1569.58, or subdivision (h) of Section 1596.8897, of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) (i) The county may cease any further review of an application if, after written notice to the applicant, the applicant fails to complete an application without good faith effort and within 30 days of the date of the notice, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply if a child is placed with the applicant pursuant to Section 309, 361.45, 727.05, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 16519.5.

(D) The cessation of an application review pursuant to this paragraph does not constitute a denial of the application for purposes of this section or any other law.

(E) For purposes of this section, the date of a previous denial, rescission,
 revocation, exemption denial or exemption rescission, or exclusion shall be either of the following:

(i) The effective date of a final decision or order upholding a notice of action or exclusion order.

(ii) The date on the notice of the decision to deny, rescind, revoke, or exclude if the notice was not appealed or otherwise constitutes a final decision.

(8) A resource family shall meet the approval standards set forth in this section, and, as applicable, Chapter 6.3 (commencing with Section 18360) of Part 6, to maintain approval. A resource family shall comply with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section and applicable laws in order to maintain approval.

(9) A resource family may be approved by a county child welfare department or a probation department pursuant to this section or by a foster family agency pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) A resource family shall not be licensed to operate a residential facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, a residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, or a residential
 care facility for persons with chronic life-threatening illnesses, as defined in Section 1568.01 of the Health and Safety Code, on the same premises used as the residence of the resource family.

(11) (A) An applicant who withdraws an application prior to its approval or denial may resubmit the application within 12 months of the withdrawal.

(B) This paragraph does not preclude a county from requiring an applicant to complete an application activity, even if that activity was previously completed.

(d) (1) The department shall adopt standards pertaining to the home environment and permanency assessments of a resource family.

(2) Resource family home environment assessment standards shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) (i) (I) A criminal record clearance of each applicant and all adults residing in, or regularly present in, the home, and not exempted from fingerprinting, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, pursuant to Section 8712 of the Family Code, utilizing a check of the Child Abuse Central Index pursuant to Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and receipt of a fingerprint-based state and federal criminal offender record information search response. The criminal history information shall include subsequent notifications pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(II) Consideration of any substantiated allegations of child abuse or neglect against the applicant and any other adult residing in, or regularly present in, the home pursuant to Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(III) If the criminal records check indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, home approval shall be denied unless the person has received a criminal records exemption pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code. If the criminal records check indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (B) or (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health
 and Safety Code, the home shall not be approved unless a criminal record exemption has been granted pursuant to subclause (IV).

(IV) If the resource family parent, applicant, or any other person specified in subclause (I) has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for an offense specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the civil penalty language, the criminal background check provisions specified in subdivisions (d) through (f) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply. Exemptions from the criminal records clearance requirements set forth in this section may be granted by the department or the county, if that county has been granted permission by the department to issue criminal record exemptions pursuant to Section 361.4, using the exemption criteria currently
 used for foster care licensing, as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(V) If it is determined, on the basis of the fingerprint images and related information submitted to the Department of Justice, that subsequent to obtaining a criminal record clearance or exemption from disqualification, the person has been convicted of, or is awaiting trial for, a sex offense against a minor, or has been convicted for an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273g, or 368 of the Penal Code, or a felony, the department or county shall notify the resource family to act immediately to remove or bar the person from entering the resource family’s home. The department or county, as applicable, may subsequently grant an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the
 Health and Safety Code. If the conviction or arrest was for another crime, the resource family shall, upon notification by the department or county, act immediately to either remove or bar the person from entering the resource family’s home, or require the person to seek an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code. The department or county, as applicable, shall determine if the person shall be allowed to remain in the home until a decision on the exemption from disqualification is rendered.

(ii) For public foster family agencies approving resource families, the criminal records clearance process set forth in clause (i) shall be utilized.

(iii) For private foster family agencies approving resource families,
 the criminal records clearance process set forth in clause (i) shall be utilized, as permitted by state and federal law.

(B) A home and grounds evaluation to ensure the health and safety of children.

(C) In addition to the foregoing requirements, the resource family home environment assessment standards shall require the following:

(i) That the applicant demonstrates an understanding of the rights of children in care and the applicant’s responsibility to safeguard those rights.

(ii) That the total number of children residing in the home of a resource family shall be no more than the total number of children the resource family can properly care for,
 regardless of status, and shall not exceed six children, unless exceptional circumstances that are documented in the foster child’s case file exist to permit a resource family to care for more children, including, but not limited to, the need to place siblings together, consistent with Section 16002.

(iii) That the applicant understands the applicant’s responsibilities with respect to acting as a reasonable and prudent parent, and maintaining the least restrictive environment that serves the needs of the child.

(3) The resource family permanency assessment standards shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Caregiver training, as described in subdivisions (g) and (h).

(B) A family evaluation, which shall include, but not be limited to, interviews of an applicant to assess the applicant’s personal history, family dynamic, and need for support or resources, and a risk assessment.

(i) When the applicant is a relative or nonrelative extended family member to an identified child, the family evaluation shall consider the nature of the relationship between the relative or nonrelative extended family member and the child. The relative or nonrelative extended family member’s expressed desire to only care for a specific child or children shall not be a reason to deny the approval.

(ii) A caregiver risk assessment shall include, but not be limited to, physical and mental health, alcohol and
 other substance use and abuse, family and domestic violence, and the factors listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(iii) A county may review and discuss data contained in the statewide child welfare database with an applicant for purposes of conducting a family evaluation, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(C) Completion of any other activities that relate to the ability of an applicant or a resource family to achieve permanency with a child.

(4) (A) For a child placed on an emergency basis pursuant to Section 309, 361.45, or 727.05, the home environment assessment, the permanency assessment, and the written report shall be completed
 within 120 days of the placement, unless good cause exists based upon the needs of the child.

(B) If additional time is needed to complete the home environment assessment or the permanency assessment, the county shall document the extenuating circumstances for the delay and generate a timeframe for the completion of those assessments.

(C) The county shall report to the department, on a quarterly basis, the number of families with emergency placements whose home environment assessment or permanency assessment goes beyond 120 days and summarize the reasons for these delays.

(e) (1) A county may place a child with a resource family applicant who has successfully completed the home environment assessment
 prior to completion of a permanency assessment only if a compelling reason for the placement exists based on the needs of the child.

(A) The permanency assessment and the written report described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (g) shall be completed within 120 days of the child’s placement in the home, unless good cause exists.

(B) If additional time is needed to comply with subparagraph (A), the county shall document the extenuating circumstances for the delay and generate a timeframe for the completion of the permanency assessment.

(C) The county shall report to the department, on a quarterly basis, the number of applicants for whom the requirements of subparagraph (A) exceed 120 days and summarize the reasons for these
 delays.

(2) The home environment and permanency assessments, and the written report described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (g), shall be completed within 120 days of a child’s placement with a relative or nonrelative extended family member pursuant to Section 309, 361.45, or 727.05, unless good cause exists.

(3) For any placement made pursuant to this subdivision, AFDC-FC funding shall not be available until approval of the resource family has been completed.

(4) A child placed pursuant to this subdivision shall be afforded all the rights set forth in Section 16001.9.

(5) This section does not limit the county’s authority to inspect the home of a resource
 family applicant as often as necessary to ensure the quality of care provided.

(6) This subdivision does not limit the county’s obligation under law to assess and give placement consideration to relatives and nonrelative extended family members and to place a child pursuant to Section 309, 361.3, 361.45, 706.6, or 727.1.

(f) The State Department of Social Services shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) (A) Until regulations are adopted, administering the program through the issuance of written directives that shall have the same force and effect as regulations. Any directive affecting Article 1 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 11 of the California Code of
 Regulations shall be approved by the Department of Justice. The directives shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) Adopting, amending, or repealing, in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any reasonable rules, regulations, and standards that may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes and intent of this article and to enable the department to exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred upon it by this section, consistent with the laws of this state.

(2) Approving and requiring the use of a single standard for resource family
 approval.

(3) Adopting and requiring the use of standardized documentation for the home environment and permanency assessments of resource families. The department shall permit counties to maintain documentation relating to the resource family approval process in an electronic format.

(4) Adopting core competencies for county staff to participate in the assessment and evaluation of an applicant or resource family.

(5) Requiring counties to monitor county-approved resource families, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Investigating complaints regarding resource families.

(B) Developing
 and monitoring resource family corrective action plans to correct identified deficiencies and to rescind resource family approval if compliance with corrective action plans is not achieved.

(6) Ongoing oversight and monitoring of county systems and operations including all of the following:

(A) Reviewing the county’s implementation plan and implementation of the program.

(B) Reviewing an adequate number of county-approved resource families in each county to ensure that approval standards are being properly applied.

(i) The review shall include case file documentation and may include onsite inspection of individual resource families.

(ii) The review shall occur on a biennial basis and more frequently if the department becomes aware that a county is experiencing a disproportionate number of complaints against individual resource family homes.

(C) Reviewing county reports of serious complaints and incidents involving resource families, as determined necessary by the department. The department may conduct an independent review of the complaint or incident and change the findings depending on the results of its investigation.

(D) Investigating unresolved complaints against counties.

(E) Requiring corrective action of counties that are not in full compliance with this section.

(7) Excluding a resource family parent, applicant, or other individual from presence in any resource family home, consistent with the established standard for any of the reasons specified in Section 16519.61.

(8) Implementing due process procedures, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Providing a statewide fair hearing process for application denials, rescissions of approval, exclusion actions, or criminal record exemption denials or rescissions by a county or the department.

(B) Providing an excluded individual with due process pursuant to Section 16519.6.

(C) Amending
 the department’s applicable state hearing procedures and regulations or using the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), when applicable, as necessary for the administration of the program.

(g) Counties shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Submitting an implementation plan and consulting with the county probation department in the development of the implementation plan.

(2) Complying with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(3) Implementing the requirements for resource family approval and utilizing standardized
 documentation established by the department. A county may maintain documentation relating to the resource family approval process in an electronic format.

(4) Training appropriate staff, including ensuring staff have the education and experience or core competencies necessary to participate in the assessment and evaluation of an applicant or resource family.

(5) (A) Taking the following actions, as applicable, for any of the reasons specified in Section 16519.61:

(i) (I) Approving or denying resource family applications, including preparing a written report that evaluates an applicant’s capacity to foster, adopt, and provide legal guardianship of a child based on all of the
 information gathered through the resource family application and assessment processes.

(II) The applicant’s preference to provide a specific level of permanency, including adoption, guardianship, or, in the case of a relative, placement with a fit and willing relative, shall not be a basis to deny an application.

(ii) Rescinding approvals of resource families.

(iii) When applicable, referring a case to the department for an action to exclude a resource family parent, applicant, or other individual from presence in any resource family home, consistent with the established standard.

(iv) Issuing a temporary suspension order that suspends the resource family
 approval prior to a hearing when, in the opinion of the county, urgent action is needed to protect a child from physical or mental abuse, abandonment, or any other substantial threat to health or safety. The county shall serve the resource family with the temporary suspension order and a copy of available discovery in the possession of the county, including, but not limited to, affidavits, declarations, names of witnesses, and other evidence upon which the county relied in issuing the temporary suspension order. The temporary suspension order shall be served upon the resource family with a notice of action, and if the matter is to be heard before the Office of Administrative Hearings, an accusation. The temporary suspension order shall list the effective date on the order.

(v) Granting, denying, or rescinding criminal record exemptions.

(B) Providing a resource family parent, applicant, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission with due process pursuant to Section 16519.6.

(C) Notifying the department of any decisions denying an application for resource family approval, rescinding the approval of a resource family, or denying or rescinding a criminal record exemption and, if applicable, notifying the department of the results of an administrative action.

(6) (A) Updating resource family approval biennially and as necessary to address any changes that have occurred in the resource family’s circumstances, including, but not limited to, moving to a new home location or commencing operation of a
 family daycare home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A county shall conduct an announced inspection of a resource family home during the biennial update, and as necessary to address any changes specified in subparagraph (A), in order to ensure that the resource family is conforming to all applicable laws and the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(7) Monitoring resource families through all of the following:

(A) Ensuring that social workers who identify a condition in the home that may not meet the approval standards set forth in subdivision (d) while in the course of a routine visit to children placed with a resource family take appropriate action as
 needed.

(B) Requiring resource families to meet the approval standards set forth in this section and to comply with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section, other applicable laws, and corrective action plans as necessary to correct identified deficiencies. If corrective action is not completed, as specified in the plan, the county may rescind the resource family approval.
